Georgia, session 2025_26, HB500.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 9 of Chapter 4 of Title 49 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to the
"Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Act," is amended in Code Section 49-4-181,
relating to definitions, by revising paragraph (4) as follows:
"(4) 'Cash assistance' means the money payment component of TANF assistance, which
shall be based on a standard of need that is equal to 40 percent of the federal poverty level
for the applicable family size and which equates to a maximum monthly amount equal
to 75 percent of such amount for each such family size."
H. B. 500 (SUB)
- 1 -

LC 57 0249S
SECTION 2.
Said article is further amended in Code Section 49-4-182, relating to the Temporary
Assistance for Needy Families Program created, by revising subsection (b) as follows:
"(b) Assistance shall be provided in accordance with the state plan and any future
amendments thereto. Cash assistance to a recipient who is not a minor child and who is a
head of a household or married to the head of a household shall be limited to a lifetime
maximum of 48 60 months, whether or not consecutive, beginning January 1, 1997
July 1, 2025."
SECTION 3.
Said article is further amended in Code Section 49-4-183, relating to administration of article
by department, promulgation of rules and regulations by board, and duties of department, by
revising paragraph (3) of subsection (b) as follows:
"(3) Consideration of the income and resources of an applicant for assistance in
determining eligibility; provided, however, that the resources of an applicant for assistance
shall not exceed $5,000.00, provided that the equity value of one vehicle per family shall
not be counted as a resource of the family if the vehicle is used for work, training, or
education preparatory to employment or job search; provided, further, that an up to
$4,650.00 exclusion of the equity value of one additional vehicle is allowed;"
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 500 (SUB)
- 2 -